Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 10. State Budget Department

History.

2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to state banking commissioner, see §

13-1-601

.

The 2021 amendment

rewrote the article heading, which read, "Department of Administration and Information."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1001.
Creation. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:49; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2001; Laws 1979, ch. 10, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3201

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1001.1.
Creation.

The state budget department is created.

History.

2021 ch. 56, § 2, effective April 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1002.
Definitions; powers generally; duties of governor; provisions construed; cooperation with legislature and judiciary; divisions enumerated.

As used in this act:

“Agency” means an office, department, board, commission or operating unit of the executive branch of state government;

“Department” means the state budget department;

“Entity” means any governmental unit, special district, corporation, partnership or person which will receive a legislative appropriation, directly or indirectly, excluding the legislature, the judiciary and the Wyoming department of transportation, game and fish department, counties, municipalities and school districts;

“Exception budget” means a budget prepared by an entity containing requests for appropriations which vary from the standard budget as prepared by the department or otherwise represents additional or increased services. The agency shall justify the new or increased services and describe all new staff, support services and additional equipment which will be required. The exception budget shall also be used to describe any decreases in nongeneral fund revenues formally supporting an entity’s services and for which a general fund appropriation is being requested;

“Executive branch” means the executive department of state government established by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 178, § 2.

“Legislature” means the legislative department of state government established by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution;

“Judiciary” means the judicial department of state government established by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution;

“Standard budget” means a budget enabling an entity to continue to furnish the same level of services during the ensuing biennium and shall reflect the revenue or appropriation necessary to provide the services. The budget shall include all personnel approved in the preceding biennial budget, a supportive service category and the amount of revenue generated by the entity during the preceding biennium and estimated revenue for the ensuing biennium regardless of the fund to which the monies were deposited. The standard budget shall not include any personnel other than those specifically authorized in the preceding biennial budget. The standard budget shall not include requests for any equipment, any special projects and services nor any requests for special or nonrecurring funding. The limitations regarding authorized personnel and equipment requests in this paragraph shall not apply to the University of Wyoming. The standard budget shall:

Reflect and identify any reductions to expenditures made pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1014

.2 in the previous fiscal biennium;

Be reduced by any amount transferred from contingent appropriations pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1014

.2 or an appropriation under W.S. 9-2-1014.3 to any fund or account and expended from the fund or account to support services of the standard budget in the previous fiscal biennium.

“This act” means W.S.

9-2-1001

.1 through 9-2-1014.2;

Renumbered by Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 4 as W.S. 9-2-3202(a)(vii).

“Base budget” means a budget containing all legislative appropriations as defined by W.S.

9-2-1013

(d)(iv), which shall be prepared by the department for each entity containing all programs for the biennium preceding the biennium for which a standard budget is being prepared pursuant to this act. The base budget and all information accompanying the base budget as required by this act shall be of sufficient detail to parallel components of the standard budget prepared for each entity under this act;

Renumbered by Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 4 as W.S. 9-2-3202(a)(viii).

Renumbered by Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 4 as W.S. 9-2-3202(a)(ix).

Renumbered by Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 4 as W.S. 9-2-3202(a)(x).

“Outstanding obligation legally incurred” means a financial obligation, chargeable to the current biennium’s appropriation, that has been lawfully incurred and for which appropriated funds have been reserved but not paid during that biennium. An “outstanding obligation legally incurred” shall include the following:

A master service agreement, master price agreement or other contract was executed or purchase order issued for goods or services but the goods were not received, or the services were not rendered, and paid for during the same biennium;

Goods or services were received pursuant to a purchase order or other contract, but an invoice was not received and paid during the same biennium;

Goods or services and an invoice were received, but payment could not be made during the same biennium;

Salaries were earned and were payable, but were not paid as of the end of the biennium as a result of pay periods not being consistent with the end of the biennium, except that higher education institutions may encumber payrolls for the remainder of the summer session which is in progress at the end of the state’s biennium if they have been budgeted and appropriated in such manner;

A written agreement for a grant, loan or award to distribute funds was signed but the funds were not distributed during the same biennium;

A written offer to provide a grant, loan or award to distribute funds was made and upon execution of an agreement a legally binding obligation to distribute the funds would be incurred, but the agreement was not signed by all parties during the biennium.

“Budget shortfall” means probable receipts from taxes or other sources of revenue for any fund or account will be less than were anticipated and that those receipts, plus existing revenues in the fund or account which are available, will be less than the amount appropriated;

“Contingent appropriation” means an appropriation of funds from the legislative stabilization reserve account which specifically identifies W.S. 9-2-1014.2 in the provision of law making the appropriation. The law providing the contingent appropriation may provide additional conditions on the expenditure of the appropriation, beyond those otherwise provided by law;

“Structural budget deficit” means that anticipated taxes and other revenues for a fiscal biennium from traditionally available revenues sources are:

Less than appropriations for the general operations of state government for the corresponding fiscal biennium; or

Are projected to be less than the expenses of the general operations of state government, assuming the same appropriations for general operations as made in the previous fiscal biennium from traditionally available revenue sources plus any increases for those operations required by existing law.

“Traditionally available revenue sources” means those revenues identified in W.S.

9-2-1013

(d)(ii) which are estimated to be deposited or credited to a state fund or account in the two (2) year budget period, and excluding revenues excluded under W.S. 9-2-1013(d) and any balances in any account or fund existing prior to the first day of the fiscal period;

“Consensus revenue estimating group” means one (1) or more representatives of the legislative and executive departments of state government, created by agreement of the governor and the legislature to estimate and forecast revenues available to the state for appropriation;

“Fund balance,” “unappropriated fund balance” or “unobligated, unencumbered fund balance,” notwithstanding cash or fund balances reflected in the state of Wyoming’s comprehensive annual financial report, means:

The fund cash and petty cash balance from the comparative balance sheet by fund report which is run within five (5) business days following the close of the prior fiscal year;

Less the fund balance reserved encumbrances from the comparative balance sheet by fund report which is run within five (5) days following the close of the prior fiscal year;

Less the remaining unspent appropriations from that fund for previous biennia, including those unspent appropriations from the most recent legislative session that were effective immediately, as computed by the state auditor’s office;

Less fund reversions as computed by the state auditor’s office;

Less restricted cash as determined by the state auditor’s office;

Plus the net accounts receivable due from the federal government or other entities as of June 30 from the most recently completed fiscal year, as computed by the state auditor’s office;

Plus mineral severance taxes, if any, to be distributed to the fund that have been earned in the most recently completed fiscal year but have not yet been distributed, as determined by the department of revenue;

Plus sales and use taxes, if any, to be distributed to the fund that have been earned in the most recently completed fiscal year but have not yet been distributed, as determined by the department of revenue;

Plus federal mineral royalties, if any, to be distributed to the fund that have been earned in the most recently completed fiscal year but have not yet been distributed, as determined by the state treasurer’s office.

“Approved budget” means:

An agency’s request for an appropriation for a program and for which an appropriation is made in whole or in part;

The governor’s recommended appropriation for an agency program developed pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1010

through 9-2-1013 and for which an appropriation is made in whole or in part;

A budget for a program as developed by the state budget department and approved by the governor for appropriations for which no budgeted request was submitted.

“Program” means a line appropriation within a general appropriation act of the legislature as so designated;

“Public welfare emergency” means a sudden financial calamity or other occurrence, either of which:

Was not foreseeable or predictable at the time of preparation and adoption of the budget and the passage of appropriation measures during the general or budget session of the legislature immediately preceding the occurrence of the emergency;

Demands immediate action to insure the proper functioning of state government or to protect the health, safety or welfare or economic well-being of the public or against the loss of essential public services; and

For which other funds are not available for expenditure or insufficient to meet the needs of the emergency.

Renumbered by Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 4 as W.S. 9-2-3202(b).

Renumbered by Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 4 as W.S. 9-2-3202(c).

Renumbered by Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 4 as W.S. 9-2-3202(d).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, §§ 2, 3, 14; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-276.18:50, 9-276.18:51, 9-276.18:62; Laws 1975, ch. 174, § 1; 1976, ch. 26, § 1; 1977, ch. 180, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-2002 Sp. Sess., 9-3-2003, 9-3-2014; Laws 1979, ch. 10, § 2; 1980, ch. 63, § 200; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 178, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 71, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 33, § 1; 2001, ch. 17, § 1; 2008, ch. 11, § 1; 2009, ch. 129, § 1; 2012, ch. 30, § 4; 2014 ch. 8, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 56, §§ 3, 4, 5, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 124, § 2, effective April 6, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “except as provided in W.S. 23 1 502(d)” in (a)(iii).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)” for “9-2-1022(a)(xi)(E)” in (a)(xi).

The 2012 amendment,

repealed (d)(iv), which read: “Information technology division.”

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch. 8, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, added (a)(xvi).

The second 2014 amendment, by ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2014,
added (a)(xiii) through (a)(xv).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, inserted “The standard budget shall” at the end of (a)(ix); added (a)(ix)(A) and (a)(ix)(B); and added (a)(xvii) through (a)(xxi).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(xxii).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018,
in (a)(iii), deleted “except as provided in W.S. 23-1-502(d)”
following “game and fish department.”

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, rewrote the section heading, which read, "Definitions; powers generally; duties of governor; provisions construed; cooperation with legislature and judiciary; divisions enumerated"; in (a)(ii), added "state budget," deleted "of administration and information" following "department"; substituted "department" for "budget division" in the first sentence of (a)(iv); in (a)(x), substituted "9-2-1001.1" for "9-2-1001" and "9-2-1014.2" for "9-2-1026.13"; and substituted "department" for "division" in (a)(xii).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 124, § 2, added "or an appropriation under W.S.

9-2-1014

.3" in (a)(xi)(B); and added (a)(xxiii) through (a)(xxv).

Laws 2021, ch. 124, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides:
“To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

Jurisdiction. —

The constitution specifically recognizes and allows that jurisdiction may be vested in entities other than the district courts; therefore the district court's jurisdiction was not unconstitutionally limited where the legislature placed jurisdiction over state personnel matters with the Department of Administration and Information. Glover v. State, 860 P.2d 1169,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1993).

Exclusive jurisdiction. —

The state Department of Administration and Information possessed exclusive jurisdiction over state personnel matters such that employee who had been terminated was required to exhaust the administrative remedies before judicial review was available. Glover v. State, 860 P.2d 1169,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1993).

Primary jurisdiction. —

Because the exclusive jurisdiction over state personnel matters rested with the Department of Administration and Information until the available administrative remedies had been exhausted, primary jurisdiction was necessarily vested in the agency. Glover v. State, 860 P.2d 1169,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1993).

District court judge's authority ended upon completion of term

and he had no authority to bind his successors to the employment of his secretary under the state personnel rules. Thus, even if the secretary had a property interest in her continued employment while this judge was in office, her employment under him was at-will and she had no property interest in its continuation. Munroe v. Kautz, 833 F. Supp. 854, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13660 (D. Wyo. 1993), aff'd, 33 F.3d 62, 1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 30842 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1994).

Stated

in

Wagoner v. State, Dep't of Admin. & Info., 924 P.2d 88,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 9-2-1003.
Director and division administrators; appointment; removal; powers of director. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:54; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2006; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, §§ 3, 6; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 2; 2012, ch. 30, § 3; 2019 ch. 71, § 1, effective February 19, 2019; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3203

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1003.1.
Director of department; appointment; removal; cooperation with legislature and judiciary.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Appointments for the director of the department shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

The governor may remove the director as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The director may:

Employ professional, technical and other assistants to work in the director’s office, along with other employees necessary to carry out the purpose of this act;

Adopt reasonable rules to administer this act pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Formulate through the director’s office the policies and programs to be carried out by the department.

This act shall be construed to provide the governor, through the department, with a more coordinated and responsive system of management of the executive branch of state government, and to preserve and protect the separation of powers mandated by article 2, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution. The department shall cooperate with the legislature and the judiciary which may utilize the services and assistance of the department to achieve economy in government, but procedures affecting the administration of the legislature shall be determined by the legislature and the management council, and procedures affecting the administration of the judiciary shall be determined by the judges for their respective courts, and they shall not be bound by rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

History.

2021 ch. 56, § 2, effective April 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1004.
Duties of the department; receipt of monthly statements of income, revenues and expenditures of state agencies and offices; authority to contract; purposes.

The department shall:

In conjunction with the human resources division of the department of administration and information, assure that all personnel transactions conform to budget requirements;

Assist and advise the auditor, treasurer, state board of equalization and department of revenue in the discharge of their duties when related to the budgetary or financial affairs of the state;

Conduct inquiries and investigations into the financial needs, fiscal obligations, expenditures, revenues, receipts, appropriations, funds, accounts, programs, services and activities of agencies. Agencies shall make available to the department all records, books, strategic planning information, correspondence and documents for this purpose and the director of the state department of audit shall provide assistance when requested by the department to carry out the responsibilities assigned by this act;

Approve the creation, standardization, identification, abolishment or consolidation of budgetary accounts from which agencies operate subject to other provisions of law;

Prescribe uniform practices and procedures for governing the receipt of federal and other monies for use by agencies when the practices and procedures are not contrary to federal law or regulations;

Appear before the joint appropriations committee as requested by the committee to provide information on the budgetary and financial affairs of the state.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 178, § 2.

The department, with the approval of the governor, may enter into contracts on behalf of the state of Wyoming with the federal government or any agency thereof for the purpose of initiating unified or joint letters of credit, simplified fund matching ratios, consolidated grants-in-aid, cost allocation programs, state audit of federally sponsored programs or any other practice that will allow the more effective, efficient and economical use of state and federal revenues.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-17, 9-276.18:55, 9-510.1; Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 7; ch. 259, § 84; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1977, ch. 180, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-1-119, 9-3-2007,

9-7-201

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 174, § 2; ch. 240, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to human resources division, see §

9-2-1022

.

As to state auditor and state treasurer, see §§

9-1-401

through

9-1-417

.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "Budget division; duties" for "Duties of the department" in the section heading; deleted "through its budget division" following "department" in (a); added "of the department of administration and information" in (a)(i); added (a)(vi); and substituted "department" for "budget division" in (c).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.